Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 3. Slum Clearance and Redevelopment Act.
Sec. 18.55.590.
Remedies of obligee.

An obligee of the corporation may, in addition to all other rights that may be conferred on the obligee, subject only to contractual restrictions binding upon the obligee,

by mandamus, suit, action, or proceeding at law or in equity compel the corporation, the members of its board of directors, and its officers, agents, or employees to perform each and every term, provision, and covenant contained in a contract of the corporation with or for the benefit of the obligee, and require the carrying out of any or all those covenants and agreements of the corporation and the fulfillment of all duties imposed upon it by AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

; and

by suit, action, or proceeding in equity enjoin any acts or things that may be unlawful, or in violation of any of the rights of the obligee of the corporation.

History.

(§ 12 ch 105 SLA 1951; am § 64 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.600.
Bonds as legal investment.

The following persons may legally invest sinking funds, money, and other funds belonging to them or within their control in the investments listed in (b) of this section:

all public officers, municipal corporations, political subdivisions, and public bodies;

all banks, trust companies, bankers, savings banks and institutions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business;

all insurance companies, insurance associations, and other persons carrying on an insurance business; and

all executors, administrators, curators, trustees, and other fiduciaries.

The following investments are proper investments under (a) of this section: any bonds or other obligations issued by the corporation under AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

or by any public housing or redevelopment authority or commission, or agency or any other public body in the United States for redevelopment purposes, when the bonds and other obligations are secured by an agreement between the issuing agency and the federal government in which the issuing agency agrees to borrow from the federal government and the federal government agrees to lend to the issuing agency, before the maturity of the bonds or other obligations, money in an amount that, together with any other money irrevocably committed to the payment of interest on the bonds or other obligations, is sufficient to pay the principal of the bonds or other obligations with interest to maturity, if, under the terms of the agreement, the money is required to be used for the purpose of paying the principal and interest on the bonds or other obligations at their maturity. The bonds and other obligations shall be authorized security for all public deposits.

It is the purpose of this section to authorize any persons, political subdivisions, and officers, public or private, to use any funds owned or controlled by them for the purchase of any of the bonds or other obligations. However, nothing contained in this section with regard to legal investments shall be construed as relieving any person of any duty of exercising reasonable care in selecting securities.

History.

(§ 13 ch 105 SLA 1951; am § 65 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.610.
Conveyance to federal government on default.

In any contract for financial assistance with the federal government, the corporation may obligate itself to convey possession or title to the redevelopment project and land to the federal government, when the contract relates to the project and the land, upon the occurrence of a substantial default.
This obligation is not a mortgage.
The obligation is specifically enforceable.
The contract may provide that in case of the conveyance, the federal government may complete, operate, manage, lease, convey, or otherwise deal with the redevelopment project in accordance with the terms of the contract; however, it shall then require that, as soon as practicable after the federal government is satisfied that all defaults have been cured and that the redevelopment project will be operated in accordance with the terms of the contract, the federal government shall reconvey the redevelopment project to the corporation.

History.

(§ 14 ch 105 SLA 1951)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 148, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, “corporation” was substituted for “authority” in two occurrences in this section.

Sec. 18.55.620.
Property exempt from taxes and execution.

All property held by the corporation for a purpose set out in AS

18.55.300

—

18.55.470

and in AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

is exempt from levy and sale by virtue of an execution, and an execution or other judicial process may not issue against it nor may judgment against it be a charge or lien upon its property. However, this subsection does not apply to or limit the right of an obligee to foreclose or otherwise enforce any mortgage of the corporation or to pursue remedies for the enforcement of a pledge or lien given by the corporation on its rents, fees, grants, or revenue.

The property held by the corporation for a purpose set out in AS

18.55.300

—

18.55.470

and in AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

is declared to be public property used for essential public and governmental purposes and the property is exempt from all taxes of the state or a political subdivision of the state. However, subject to (c) of this section, the corporation shall, from the time it acquires title to property in a redevelopment project until it sells, leases, or otherwise disposes of that property, make payment equal in amount and in lieu of taxes that would be assessed and paid to a political subdivision in which the property is situated if the property had not been acquired by the corporation. From the time the corporation sells, leases, or otherwise transfers the property, the obligation of the corporation to make payment in lieu of taxes shall cease and the property shall thereafter be taxable in the same manner as other property within the political subdivision, unless the property is exempt from taxation by law. The property sold, leased, or otherwise transferred by the corporation may be assessed for taxation on that part of the tax year during which it was not owned by the corporation, unless the property is exempt from taxation by law. Except for the payments required by this subsection, the power vested in the corporation to make payments in lieu of taxes under AS

18.55.250

or other law is not affected by this subsection.

Property for which payments are required under (b) of this section is limited to land and valuable improvements on the land, including buildings located on the property on the assessment date.

Payments for property under (b) of this section may not be required from the corporation unless the payments are eligible project costs under federal policy.

History.

(§ 15 ch 105 SLA 1951; am §§ 1, 2 ch 102 SLA 1967; am § 66 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.630.
Cooperation by public bodies.

For the purpose of aiding and cooperating in the planning, undertaking, or carrying out of a redevelopment project located within the area in which it is authorized to act, a public body may, upon terms, with or without consideration, as it determines,

dedicate, sell, convey, or lease any of its interest in a property, or grant easements, licenses, or other rights or privileges in the property to the corporation;

cause parks, playgrounds, or recreational, community, educational, water, sewer, or drainage facilities, or other works that it is otherwise empowered to undertake to be furnished in connection with a redevelopment project;

furnish, dedicate, close, vacate, pave, install, grade, regrade, plan, or replan streets, roads, sidewalks, ways, or other places, that it is otherwise empowered to undertake;

plan or replan, or zone or rezone any part of the public body or make exceptions from building regulations and ordinances if the functions are of the character that the public body is otherwise empowered to perform;

cause administrative and other services to be furnished to the corporation of the character that the public body is otherwise empowered to undertake or furnish for the same or other purposes;

incur the entire expense of public improvements made by the public body in exercising the powers granted in this section;

do any and all things necessary or convenient to aid and cooperate in the planning or carrying out of a redevelopment plan;

lend, grant, or contribute money to the corporation;

employ any money belonging to or within the control of the public body, including money derived from the sale or furnishing of property, service, or facilities to the corporation, in the purchase of the bonds or other obligations of the corporation and, as the holder of the bonds or other obligations, exercise the rights connected with them; and

enter into agreements, which may extend over any period, notwithstanding a provision or rule of law to the contrary, with the corporation respecting action to be taken by the public body under any of the powers granted by AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

.

If at any time title to or possession of a redevelopment project is held by a public body or governmental agency, other than the corporation, authorized by law to engage in the undertaking, carrying out, or administration of redevelopment projects, including the federal government, the provisions of the agreement shall inure to the benefit of and may be enforced by the public body or governmental agency.

A sale, conveyance, lease, or agreement provided for in this section may be made by a public body without appraisal, public notice, advertisement, or public bidding.

History.

(§ 16 ch 105 SLA 1951; am § 67 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 148, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, “corporation” was substituted for “authority” in (b) of this section.

Sec. 18.55.640.
Report by the authority. [Repealed, § 140 ch 4 SLA 1992.]

Sec. 18.55.650.
Title of purchaser of project property.

An instrument executed by the corporation and purporting to convey a right, title, or interest in property under AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

is conclusive evidence of compliance with the provisions of AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

insofar as title or other interest of a bona fide purchaser, lessee, or transferee of the property is concerned.

History.

(§ 18 ch 105 SLA 1951)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 148, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, “corporation” was substituted for “authority” in this section.

Sec. 18.55.660.
Additional powers of governing body.

Whenever the corporation exercises its rights, powers, and duties under AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

in the area adjacent to a municipality, the governing body of the municipality may prepare or have prepared general plans for the physical development of the area if the preparation of those plans is not otherwise authorized by law and approve redevelopment plans, and lend or grant money and other assistance for the undertaking of redevelopment projects in the area and to take other action with respect to the area or redevelopment project area that is authorized or required by AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

of the governing body of the municipality.

History.

(§ 19 ch 105 SLA 1951; am § 68 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.670.
Preparation of general plan by local governing body.

The governing body of a municipality, not authorized to create a planning commission with power to prepare a general plan for the redevelopment of the municipality, may prepare a general plan before a redevelopment project is initiated under AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

.

History.

(§ 20 ch 105 SLA 1951)

Sec. 18.55.680.
Urban renewal projects; definition.

In addition to the power given under AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

, the corporation may plan and undertake an urban renewal project. In AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

an urban renewal project includes undertaking and activity for the elimination and prevention of the development or spread of slums or blighted, deteriorated, or deteriorating areas. An urban renewal project may involve any work or undertaking for this purpose that constitutes a redevelopment project or any rehabilitation or conservation work or any combination of an undertaking or work.

Rehabilitation or conservation work includes

carrying out plans for a program of voluntary or compulsory repair and rehabilitation of buildings or other improvements;

acquisition of real property and demolition, removal, or rehabilitation of buildings and improvements from it where necessary to eliminate unhealthful, insanitary, or unsafe conditions, lessen density, reduce traffic hazards, eliminate obsolete or other uses detrimental to the public welfare, or to otherwise remove or prevent the spread of blight or deterioration, or to provide land for needed public facilities;

installation, construction, or reconstruction of streets, utilities, parks, playgrounds, and other improvements necessary for carrying out the objectives of the urban renewal project; and

the disposition, for uses in accordance with the objectives of the urban renewal project, of any property or part of property acquired in the area of the project; disposition shall be in the manner prescribed in AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

for the disposition of property in a redevelopment project area.

History.

(§ 24 ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955; am § 69 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.690.
Urban renewal plan; definition.

An urban renewal project undertaken pursuant to AS

18.55.680

shall be undertaken in accordance with an urban renewal plan for the area of the project.
As used in AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

an “urban renewal plan” means a plan for an urban renewal project, which (1) conforms to the general plan for the municipality as a whole; and (2) is sufficiently complete to indicate the land acquisition, demolition and removal of structures, redevelopment, improvements, and rehabilitation that are proposed in the area of the urban renewal project, zoning, and planning changes, if any, land uses, maximum densities, building requirements, and the plan’s relationship to definite local objectives respecting appropriate land uses, improved traffic, public transportation, public utilities, recreational and community facilities, and other public improvements.
An urban renewal plan shall be prepared and approved pursuant to the same procedure as provided in AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

for a redevelopment plan.

History.

(§ 25 ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955)

Administrative Code. —

For HUD assisted disposition of real property acquired under renewal and neighborhood development programs, see 15 AAC 150, art. 5.

Secs. 18.55.695 — 18.55.698.
Use of tax collections; loan agreements; taxation of leased property. [Repealed, § 31 ch 37 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 18.55.700.
Powers with respect to urban renewal.

The corporation has all the powers necessary or convenient to undertake and carry out urban renewal plans and urban renewal projects, including the power to acquire and dispose of property, to issue bonds and other obligations, to borrow and accept grants from the federal government or other source, and to exercise the other powers granted to it by AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

with respect to redevelopment projects.

In connection with the planning and undertaking of an urban renewal plan or urban renewal project, the corporation, the municipality, and all public and private offices, agencies, and bodies have all the rights, powers, privileges, and immunities that they have with respect to a redevelopment plan or redevelopment project, in the same manner as though all of the provisions of AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

applicable to a redevelopment plan or redevelopment project were applicable to an urban renewal plan or urban renewal project. However, for the purpose of this subsection,

the word “redevelopment” as used in AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

, except in this section and in the definition of “redevelopment project” in AS

18.55.950

, means “urban renewal”;

the words “slum” and “blighted” as used in AS 18.55.480 — 18.55.960, except in this section and in the definitions in AS

18.55.950

, mean “blighted, deteriorated, or deteriorating”; and

the finding required by AS

18.55.510(b)

with respect to a blighted area is not required.

In addition to the surveys and plans that the corporation may otherwise make, it may make plans

for carrying out a program of voluntary repair and rehabilitation of buildings and improvements; and

for the enforcement of laws, codes, and regulations relating to the use of land and the use and occupancy of buildings and improvements, and the compulsory repair, rehabilitation, demolition, or removal of buildings and improvements.

The corporation may develop, test, and report methods and techniques, and carry out demonstrations and other activities for the prevention and the elimination of slums and urban blight.

History.

(§ 26 ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955; am § 3 ch 84 SLA 1964; am § 2 ch 139 SLA 1970; am § 31 ch 37 SLA 1986; am § 70 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.710.
Public bodies authorized to assist in urban renewal projects.

A municipality or other public body may, without limiting any provisions of AS

18.55.700

, do any and all things necessary to aid and cooperate in the planning and undertaking of an urban renewal project in the area in which it is authorized to act, including the furnishing of financial and other assistance as the municipality or public body is authorized by AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

for or in connection with a redevelopment plan or redevelopment project.

History.

(§ 27 ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955)

Sec. 18.55.720.
Corporation may delegate functions to municipalities and public bodies.

The corporation may delegate to a municipality or other public body any of its powers or functions with respect to the planning or undertaking of an urban renewal project in the area in which the municipality or public body is authorized to act, and the municipality or public body may carry out or perform these powers and functions for the corporation.

History.

(§ 27 ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 148, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, “corporation” was substituted for “authority” in the section heading and text of this section.

Sec. 18.55.730.
Agreements for exercising powers and granting assistance.

Any public body may enter into agreements that may extend over any period, notwithstanding any provision or rule of law to the contrary, with any other public body respecting action to be taken under any power granted by AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

, including the furnishing of funds or other assistance in connection with an urban renewal plan or urban renewal project.

History.

(§ 27 ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955)

Sec. 18.55.740.
Workable program.

The governing body of a municipality, or a public officer or public body, as it designates, may prepare a workable program, including an official plan of action, for effectively dealing with the problem of urban slums and blighted, deteriorated, or deteriorating areas within the community and for the establishment and preservation of a well-planned community with well-organized residential neighborhoods of decent homes and suitable living environment for adequate family life, for utilizing appropriate private and public resources to eliminate, and prevent the development or spread of, slums and urban blight and deterioration, to encourage needed urban rehabilitation, to provide for the redevelopment of blighted, deteriorated, or slum areas, or to undertake any of these activities or other feasible activities that may be suitably employed to achieve the objectives of the program.

History.

(§ 28 ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955)

Sec. 18.55.750.
Municipality may repair, etc., dwellings unfit for habitation.

When a municipality finds that a dwelling exists that is unfit for human habitation due to dilapidation, defects increasing the hazard of fire, accident, or other calamity, lack of ventilation, light or sanitary facilities, or another condition, including one of those set out in AS

18.55.860

that makes the dwelling unsafe or insanitary, or dangerous or detrimental to the health, safety, or morals, or otherwise inimical to the welfare of the residents of the municipality, the municipality may require or cause the repair, closing, or demolition or removal of the dwelling in the manner provided in AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

.

History.

(§ 29(a) ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955)

Sec. 18.55.760.
Ordinances relating to unfit dwellings.

Upon the adoption of an ordinance finding that dwelling conditions of the character described in AS

18.55.750

exist in a municipality, its governing body may adopt an ordinance relating to dwellings that are unfit for human habitation.

History.

(§ 29(b) ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955)

Sec. 18.55.770.
What ordinance must include.

An ordinance adopted under AS

18.55.760

must provide that the corporation must exercise the powers prescribed by the ordinance.
The ordinance must also contain the provisions set out in AS

18.55.780

—

18.55.850

.

History.

(§ 29(b) ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 148, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, “corporation” was substituted for “authority” in this section.

Sec. 18.55.780.
Petition or finding that dwelling is unfit and filing of complaint.

When at least five residents file a petition charging that a dwelling is unfit for human habitation or when it appears to a public officer that a dwelling is unfit for human habitation, the public officer shall conduct a preliminary investigation, and if the investigation discloses a basis for the charges, the public officer shall issue and have served upon the owner, every mortgagee of record, and all parties in interest in the dwelling, including those in possession, a complaint stating the charges.

History.

(§ 29(b) ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955)

Sec. 18.55.790.
Pleadings and hearing.

The complaint must contain a notice of a hearing before the corporation or designated agent and the time and place fixed for the hearing.
The hearing shall be not less than 10 days nor more than 30 days after the service of the complaint. The complaint must state that the parties in interest may file an answer to the complaint, appear and give testimony at the place and time fixed in the complaint.

History.

(§ 29(b) ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 148, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, “corporation” was substituted for “authority” in this section.

Sec. 18.55.800.
Rules of evidence do not control in hearings before the corporation.

The rules of evidence in judicial proceedings are not controlling in hearings before the corporation.

History.

(§ 29(b) ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 148, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, “corporation” was substituted for “authority” in the section heading and text of this section.

Sec. 18.55.810.
Findings and order.

If, after the hearing, the executive director of the corporation determines that the dwelling is unfit for human habitation, the executive director shall state the findings of fact in support of the determination in writing and shall issue and have served upon the owner an order which,

if the dwelling can be repaired, altered, or improved at a reasonable cost in relation to its value, shall require the owner, within the time specified in the order, to repair, alter, or improve the dwelling to render it fit for human habitation or to vacate and close the dwelling as a human habitation; or

if the dwelling cannot be repaired, altered, or improved at a reasonable cost in relation to its value, shall require the owner, within the time specified in the order, to remove or demolish the dwelling.

History.

(§ 29(b) ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 148, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, “corporation” was substituted for “authority” in this section.

Sec. 18.55.820.
Ordinance to fix percentage of cost as reasonable.

The ordinance of the municipality must fix the percentage of the cost of repair, alteration, or improvement for the purpose of determining whether the cost is reasonable within the meaning of AS

18.55.810

.

History.

(§ 29(b) ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955)

Sec. 18.55.830.
Failure of owner to comply with order.

If the owner fails to comply with an order to repair, alter, or improve or to vacate and close the dwelling, the corporation may have the dwelling repaired, altered or improved, or vacated.

If the owner fails to comply with an order to remove or demolish the dwelling, the corporation may have the dwelling removed or demolished.

History.

(§ 29(b) ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 148, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, “corporation” was substituted for “authority” in (a) and (b) of this section.

Sec. 18.55.840.
Costs of repair, etc., are a lien.

If the corporation has the dwelling repaired, altered, improved, vacated and closed, removed or demolished, the costs, including costs of the proceeding and necessary attorney fees, constitute a lien against the real property and the lien may be foreclosed in the manner provided or authorized by law for loans secured by liens on real property.

History.

(§ 29(b) ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 148, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, “corporation” was substituted for “authority” in this section.

Sec. 18.55.850.
Disposition of material where dwelling is removed or demolished.

If the corporation removes or demolishes the dwelling, it shall sell the materials and shall credit the proceeds of the sale against the costs of the removal or demolition.
If there is a surplus remaining, the corporation shall return it to the parties entitled to it as determined by a judicial proceeding brought by the corporation. The court shall determine the cost incurred by the corporation in this judicial proceeding including its necessary attorney fees, and shall deduct the cost from the surplus.

History.

(§ 29(b) ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 148, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, “corporation” was substituted for “authority” in four occurrences in this section.

Sec. 18.55.860.
Ordinance to give corporation power to determine fitness of dwellings for habitation.

The ordinance adopted by a municipality under AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

must provide that the corporation may determine that a dwelling is unfit for human habitation if it finds that conditions exist that

are dangerous or injurious to the health, comfort, safety, or morals of the occupant of the dwelling, the occupants of neighboring dwellings or other residents of the municipality; or

have a blighting influence on properties in the area;

may provide additional standards to guide the corporation in determining the fitness of a dwelling for human habitation.

The conditions sufficient to support a finding under (a)(1) of this section include the following, without limitation:

defects increasing the hazards of fire, accident, or other calamity;

lack of adequate ventilation, light, or sanitary facilities, or an adequate heating source;

dilapidation;

disrepair;

structural defects;

uncleanliness;

overcrowding;

inadequate ingress and egress;

inadequate drainage; or

a violation of health, fire, building, or zoning regulations, or any other laws or regulations, relating to the use of land and the use and occupancy of buildings and improvements.

History.

(§ 29(c) ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955; am §§ 71, 72 ch 4 FSSLA 1992)

Sec. 18.55.870.
Manner of serving parties in interest.

The corporation shall serve complaints and orders issued in accordance with AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

upon all parties in interest either personally or by registered mail.
If, after the exercise of reasonable diligence, the corporation cannot find a party, it shall make an affidavit to that effect, and it may then effect service by publishing the complaint or order once each week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper printed and published in the municipality, or, if there is none, in a newspaper printed and published in the state and circulated in the municipality in which the dwelling is located.
The corporation shall also post a copy of the complaint or order in a conspicuous place on the premises affected and file a copy with the clerk of the superior court in the judicial district in which the dwelling is located. The filing of the complaint or order with the clerk has the same effect as other lis pendens notices provided by law.

History.

(§ 29(d) ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 148, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, “corporation” was substituted for “authority” in three occurrences in this section.

Sec. 18.55.880.
Injunction to prevent corporation from proceeding.

A person affected by an order issued by the corporation may, within 60 days from the date the order is posted and served, petition the superior court for an injunction restraining the corporation from carrying out the provisions of the order, and the court may, upon the petition, issue a temporary injunction restraining the corporation from proceeding until it disposes of the matter. The court shall hear the petition within 20 days from the date it is filed, or as soon after filing as possible. A petition for an injunction under this section shall be given preference over other matters on the court calendar. The court shall hear and determine the issues raised and shall enter a final order or decree in the proceeding. The findings of fact by the corporation, if supported by evidence, are conclusive.
Costs shall be awarded in the discretion of the court.

History.

(§ 29(e) ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 148, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, “corporation” was substituted for “authority” in the section heading and text of this section.

Sec. 18.55.890.
Remedies provided are exclusive.

The remedies provided in AS

18.55.880

are exclusive and a person affected by an order of the corporation may not recover damages for an action taken under an order of the corporation, or because the person complies with an order of the corporation.

History.

(§ 29(e) ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 148, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, “corporation” was substituted for “authority” in three occurrences in this section.

Sec. 18.55.900.
Ordinance may give corporation additional powers.

An ordinance adopted by the governing body of the municipality may authorize the corporation to exercise those powers that are necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

including the power to:

investigate the dwelling conditions in the municipality in order to determine which dwellings are unfit for human habitation;

administer oaths and affirmations, examine witnesses, and receive evidence;

enter upon premises for the purpose of making examinations, if the entry is made in the manner that causes the least possible inconvenience to the person in possession, or, if entry is denied, obtain a court order for this purpose;

appoint and fix the duties of the officers, agents, and employees that the corporation considers necessary to carry out the purposes of the ordinance; and

delegate functions and powers under the ordinance to the officers, agents and employees whom the corporation designates.

History.

(§ 29(f) ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 148, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, “corporation” was substituted for “authority” in the section heading and text of this section.

Sec. 18.55.910.
Municipality to prepare estimate of costs of administration.

After adopting an ordinance under AS

18.55.750

—

18.55.930

the governing body of the municipality shall as soon as possible prepare an estimate of the annual expenses necessary to provide the equipment, personnel, and supplies for periodic examinations and investigations of dwellings for the purpose of determining their fitness for human habitation, and for the enforcement and administration of ordinances of the municipality.

History.

(§ 29(g) ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955)

Sec. 18.55.920.
AS 18.55.750 — 18.55.930 not a limitation on municipalities.

AS

18.55.750

—

18.55.930

do not limit the power of a municipality to enforce its ordinances or regulations, and to prevent or punish violations of them, or to define and declare nuisances and have them removed or abated.
The powers granted by AS

18.55.750

—

18.55.930

are in addition to the powers granted by any other law.

History.

(§ 29(h)(i) ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955)

Sec. 18.55.930.
Powers of a municipality to control use and occupancy of dwellings.

A municipality may, by ordinance adopted by its governing body,

prescribe minimum standards for the use and occupancy of dwellings inside its boundaries;

prevent the use or occupancy of a dwelling that is injurious to the public health, safety, morals or welfare; and

prescribe punishment for the violation of the ordinance.

History.

(§ 29(j) ch 105 SLA 1951; added by § 1 ch 184 SLA 1955)

Sec. 18.55.932.
Urban redevelopment or urban renewal in a disaster area.

Notwithstanding any other provisions in AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

, when the legal governing body certifies that an area is in need of redevelopment or urban renewal as a result of the earthquakes of 1964 and all results and aftereffects respecting which the governor has certified the need for disaster assistance, the corporation may plan, undertake, and carry out a redevelopment project or an urban renewal project in the disaster area and the area shall constitute a slum or blighted area.

In connection with the carrying out of a project under this section, the corporation may, with the approval of the local governing body and before the approval of the redevelopment plan or urban renewal plan, acquire real property in the project area, demolish and remove any structure on the property, and pay all costs related to the acquisition, demolition, or removal, including administrative or relocation expenses.

The governing body, when the corporation acquires land under (b) of this section, may assume the responsibility to bear any loss that may result from the acquisition in the event that the real property is not made part of the project.

Real property acquired under this section that is not made a part of the project may be disposed of without regard to AS

18.55.540

if the local governing body has consented to the disposal.

The corporation, in carrying out a project under this section, may recommend to the local governing body a redevelopment plan or an urban renewal plan without regard to the requirement in AS

18.55.530(c)

that a general plan for the physical development of the municipality has been prepared before the recommendation, and the governing body may approve the plan without regard to the requirement in AS

18.55.530(i)

that the plan conform with the general plan for the physical development of the area.

For the purpose of this section, the corporation may file and use a declaration of taking and acquire real property as provided in AS

09.55.420

—

09.55.460

.

The provisions of this section apply whenever an area has been declared by the President of the United States to be a disaster area and the legal governing body certifies that the need of the area for redevelopment or urban renewal has been substantially increased as a result of the natural disaster and all results and aftereffects respecting which the governor has also certified the need for disaster assistance.

History.

(§ 5 ch 79 SLA 1964; am § 2 ch 16 FSSLA 1967)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 148, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, “corporation” was substituted for “authority” in (a) - (c), (e), and (f) of this section.

Sec. 18.55.934.
State aid for an urban redevelopment or urban renewal project in a disaster area.

In connection with any project carried out under AS

18.55.932

, the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development may contract with the corporation, under terms approved by the governor, to provide a state grant-in-aid equal to one-half the excess of the cost of the project, as determined by the commissioner, over the federal grant-in-aid.

[Repealed, § 16 ch 20 SLA 2002.]

For purposes of this section, “cost of the project” includes, in addition to costs directly related to the project, the sum total of all costs of financing and carrying out the project. These include, but are not limited to, the costs of all necessary studies, surveys, plans and specifications, architectural, engineering or other special services, acquisition of real property, site preparation and development, purchase, construction, reconstruction and improvement of real property and the acquisition of machinery and equipment as may be necessary in connection with the project; an allocable portion of the administrative and operating expenses of the grantee; the cost of financing the project, including interest on bonds issued to finance the project; and the cost of other items, including any indemnity and surety bonds and premiums on insurance, legal fees, fees and expenses of trustees, depositaries, financial advisors, and paying agents for the bonds issued as the issuer considers necessary.

History.

(§ 5 ch 79 SLA 1964; am § 22 ch 168 SLA 1978; am § 16 ch 20 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, under § 148, ch. 4, FSSLA 1992, “corporation” was substituted for “authority” in (a) of this section.

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (a) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 18.55.940.
Inconsistent provisions superseded.

Insofar as the provisions of AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

are inconsistent with any other law, the provisions of AS

18.55.480

—

18.55.960

shall control.

History.

(§ 22 ch 105 SLA 1951)

Sec. 18.55.945.
Limitation. [Repealed, § 31 ch 37 SLA 1986.]